Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 3

Property Tax Incentives for Economic Development

4-17-301. Legislative findings and intent.

The general assembly finds and declares that property tax incentives, resulting from legal ownership of valuable business or commercial properties by local governments or their agencies under various statutory programs, has served to promote economic development, but confusion and nonuniformity in structuring such incentives have led to uncertainty in determining property tax liability of new investment prospects. It is the intent of this part to provide for state and local review of property tax incentives for economic development. It is not the intent of this part to authorize new property tax incentives beyond those authorized by law on January 1, 1993.

Acts 1992, ch. 1000, § 1.

4-17-302. Economic development agreement defined.

As used in this part, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Economic development agreement” means an agreement between a private entity and local government agency that permits use of specified property of the local government or its agencies for business or commercial purposes of the private entity, in order to promote local economic development, and that has the effect of reducing property taxes on such property below amounts that would be due if the property were owned by the private entity; and

“Economic development agreement” includes, but is not limited to, leases or other agreements with private entities under the industrial development program provided in title 7, chapter 53, and redevelopment plans and agreements containing tax increment financing provisions authorized under title 13, chapter 20, including development authorities created by private act, as authorized pursuant to § 13-20-202(c).

Acts 1992, ch. 1000, § 2; 2005, ch. 352, § 1.

4-17-303. Agreements — Writing — Submission — Approval — Late filing payment in lieu of tax.

All economic development agreements shall be reduced to writing and submitted to the chief executive officer of each jurisdiction in which the property is located and to the comptroller of the treasury, for review, but not approval. The agreement may be submitted in advance of its execution but must be submitted within ten (10) days after its execution. The name of private business entities that are parties to the agreement may be obscured on copies of agreements submitted in advance of their execution. If the agreement is not filed within thirty (30) days after written demand by the comptroller of the treasury or other public entity with which it is to be filed, the private entity that is party to the agreement shall owe an additional payment in lieu of tax in the amount of five hundred dollars ($500).

Acts 1992, ch. 1000, § 3; 2008, ch. 1013, § 1.

4-17-304. Petitions to boards for adjudication of issues.

For purposes of establishing the taxable value, classification, or exempt status of property subject to an economic development agreement, the parties may petition the local and state boards of equalization for adjudication of such issues in the manner otherwise required by law for filing appeals from local assessments.

Acts 1992, ch. 1000, § 4.

4-17-305. Applicability.

This part shall not affect rights or duties that matured, liabilities or penalties that were incurred, or proceedings begun before January 1, 1993, except that the parties to any existing economic development agreements otherwise required to be disclosed under this part shall disclose the existence and terms of such agreements to the comptroller of the treasury on or before January 1, 1993.

Acts 1992, ch. 1000, § 5.